Washington statutes.
RCW 11.40.140

Claim of personal representative—Presentation and petition—Filing.

If the personal representative has a claim against the decedent, the personal representative must present the claim in the manner provided in RCW 11.40.070, and the allowance or rejection of the claim shall be addressed, resolved, and settled under the procedures provided under chapter 11.96A RCW. This section applies whether or not the personal representative is acting under nonintervention powers.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4001; 1999 c 42 s 608; 1997 c 252 s 21; 1965 c 145 s 11.40.140. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 120; RRS s 1490; prior: Code 1881 s 1482; 1854 p 283 s 94.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Request for special notice of proceedings in probate—Prohibitions: RCW 11.28.240.